Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB267.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Political activities" includes but is not limited to:
1. Registering to vote and voting;
2. Soliciting votes or endorsements on behalf of a political candidate or
political campaign;
3. Expressing opinions, either publicly or privately, on political subjects
and candidates;
4. Displaying political signs, pictures, stickers, badges, or buttons;
5. Participating in the activities of, or contributing financially to, a
political party, political group, candidate, campaign, or any
organization that supports a political candidate or campaign;
6. Attending or participating in a political convention, caucus, rally, or
other political gathering;
7. Initiating, circulating, or signing a petition in favor of or in opposition
to a candidate, public question, or a particular political position or
opinion;
8. Engaging in fundraising activities for any political party, political
organization, political group, candidate, or campaign;
9. Acting as a recorder, watcher, challenger, or similar officer at the
polls on behalf of a political party, political organization, political
group, candidate, or campaign; and
10. Becoming a political candidate; and
(b) "Political party," "political organization," and "political group" have the
same meaning as in KRS 118.015.
Page 1 of 6
BR177700.100 - 1777 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1777
(2) No provision of law shall prohibit an officer of the department or individual
employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class from participating in political
activities while off duty, out of uniform, and off the premises of his or her usual
place of employment.
(3) An officer of the department or individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE
R Class shall not:
(a) Use his or her official authority to:
1. Influence, coerce, or attempt to influence or coerce, a subordinate
employee to pay, lend, or contribute anything of value to a political
party, candidate, or campaign; or
2. Discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment due to
that person's political affiliation or political activity, unless otherwise
provided by law as a disqualification for employment;
(b) Discriminate in providing public services, including but not limited to law
enforcement services, on the basis of any political affiliation or political
activities of any person, group, or organization; or
(c) Suggest or imply that any employee or agency of state government has
officially endorsed a political party, political organization, political group,
candidate, or campaign.
(4) While engaging in any political activity under this section, an officer of the
department or individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class shall
not:
(a) Wear a uniform or any part of a uniform that would identify him or her as
an officer or trooper;
(b) Use any equipment or property of the department;
(c) Display or otherwise attempt to cause others to believe the officer or
employee is carrying a firearm, star, badge, or other indication of law
Page 2 of 6
BR177700.100 - 1777 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1777
enforcement authority;
(d) Promote himself or herself as an officer of the department or Trooper R
Class or CVE R Class representing the interests of the department;
(e) Solicit contributions from employees or nonemployees during regular
working hours; or
(f) Solicit or receive any political contribution of any kind while on state
property, unless the property is rented or leased by a private individual or
corporate entity[shall, directly or indirectly, give, solicit or receive, or be in
any manner concerned in giving, soliciting or receiving, any assessment,
subscription or contribution for any political party or political purpose
whatever. No officer or individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R
Class shall, orally or by letter, solicit or be in any manner concerned in
soliciting any assessment, subscription or contribution for any political party
or purpose whatever from any person holding a position in the department. No
officer of the department or individual employed as a Trooper R Class or
CVE R Class shall take any part in political management or affairs or in
political campaigns further than to cast his vote and to express privately his
opinion].
(5) Any violation of the provisions of this section[hereof] shall be grounds for removal.
Section 2. KRS 16.195 is amended to read as follows:
For officers governed by KRS 16.186 to 16.195, the following subjects shall be administered
in the same manner as provided for state police officers governed by KRS 16.010 to 16.185:
(1) Prohibition against requesting or requiring victim of alleged sexual offense to
submit to polygraph or other examination, as provided by KRS 16.062;
(2) Organization of the department, as provided by KRS 16.040(1);
(3) Additional duties of the department, as provided by KRS 16.065;
(4) Uniforms, equipment, and facilities, as provided by KRS 16.070;
Page 3 of 6
BR177700.100 - 1777 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1777
(5) Automobile liability insurance, as provided by KRS 16.075;
(6) Bonds of employees, as provided by KRS 16.080;
(7) Training school, as provided by KRS 16.090;
(8) Officers required to take educational course on AIDS, as provided by KRS 16.095;
(9) Travel expenses and per diem allowances, as provided by KRS 16.100;
(10) Fees or rewards, as provided by KRS 16.110;
(11) Disabled officer on hazardous duty may elect to be retained on payroll, as provided
by KRS 16.165.
(12) Election of benefits by disabled officer, as provided by KRS 16.167.
(13) Restrictions on political activity[ forbidden], as provided by KRS 16.170; and
(14) Indemnification of state police officer sued for act or omission in line of duty who
suffers financial loss, as provided by KRS 16.185.
Section 3. KRS 16.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner is the head and chief executive officer of the department. He or
she shall provide for himself or herself, each officer of the department, and each
individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, under the provisions of
KRS 45A.045 to 45A.650, such uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including
motor vehicles, necessary to the performance of their respective duties, but all
uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles, shall remain the
property of the Commonwealth. The commissioner may sell through the Finance
and Administration Cabinet, under the provisions of KRS 45A.045 to 45A.650,
such uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles, as become unfit
for use, and all moneys received therefrom shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to a revolving fund to be used by the department.
(2) The commissioner shall keep an inventory and shall charge against each officer and
each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class the value of all
property of the department issued to him or her, and if it is determined by the
Page 4 of 6
BR177700.100 - 1777 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1777
commissioner that any loss or destruction of property was due to the carelessness or
neglect of an officer or an individual employed as a Trooper R Class, then the value
of the property shall be deducted from the pay of the officer or the individual
employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.
(3) (a) By agreement with the commissioner of highways of the Commonwealth, the
commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police may provide for
the leasing of motor vehicles and accessories thereto, radio facilities and
equipment, office equipment, and other property or facilities, upon [such
]terms and conditions and for [such ]compensation as provided in the
agreement[said agreement may provide].
(b) The commissioner of highways and the commissioner of the Department of
Kentucky State Police may further provide, by agreement, for the service and
repair at any state garage of motor vehicles or accessories thereto which are
owned, operated, or rented by the department, upon [such ]terms and
conditions and for [such ]compensation as provided in the agreement[said
agreement may provide].
(c) Subject to KRS Chapter 42, the department is authorized, by lease or
purchase, to acquire, maintain, and operate motor vehicles, and the officers of
said department, including the commissioner and individuals employed as a
Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, are authorized and empowered to operate
such motor vehicles in the course of their duties, and in carrying out the
purposes, responsibilities, and functions provided for in KRS 16.010 to
16.170, except as may be otherwise provided.
(4) The commissioner shall establish local headquarters so as to best distribute the
officers, individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, and
employees of the department throughout the various sections of the Commonwealth
where they will be most efficient in carrying out the provisions of KRS 16.010 to
Page 5 of 6
BR177700.100 - 1777 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1777
16.199.
Page 6 of 6
BR177700.100 - 1777 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:13 PM Jacketed